Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.532

[Art. 59] Execution of sentence—Suspension of sentence.

Except as provided in RCW 38.38.196 and 38.38.556, a court-martial sentence, unless suspended, may be ordered executed by the convening authority when approved by him or her. The convening authority shall approve the sentence or such part, amount, or commuted form of the sentence as he or she sees fit, and may suspend the execution of the sentence as approved by him or her.

[ 1989 c 48 s 54; 1963 c 220 s 61.]